Utah statutes.
32B-4-501.   Operating without a license or permit.

(1)  A person may not operate the following businesses without first obtaining a license under this title if the business allows a person to purchase or consume an alcoholic product on the premises of the business:

(a)  a restaurant;

(b)  an airport lounge;

(c)  a business operated in the same manner as a club licensee;

(d)  a resort;

(e)  a business operated to sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer for on-premise consumption;

(f)  a business operated as an on-premise banquet licensee; or

(g)  a business similar to one listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (f).

(2)  A person conducting an event that is open to the general public may not directly or indirectly sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to a person attending the event without first obtaining an event permit under this title.

(3)  A person conducting a private event may not directly or indirectly sell or offer for sale an alcoholic product to a person attending the private event without first obtaining an event permit under this title.

(4)  A person may not operate the following businesses in this state without first obtaining a license under this title:

(a)  a winery manufacturer;

(b)  a distillery manufacturer;

(c)  a brewery manufacturer;

(d)  a local industry representative of:

(i)  a manufacturer of an alcoholic product;

(ii)  a supplier of an alcoholic product; or

(iii)  an importer of an alcoholic product;

(e)  a liquor warehouser; or

(f)  a beer wholesaler.

(5)  A person may not operate a public conveyance in this state without first obtaining a public service permit under this title if that public conveyance allows a person to purchase or consume an alcoholic product:

(a)  on the public conveyance; or

(b)  on the premises of a hospitality room located within a depot, terminal, or similar facility at which a service is provided to a patron of the public conveyance.

